Utah statutes.
17-42-105.5.   Sterilization deposit -- When required for redemption by owner of impounded animal.

(1)  Upon the second impound within a 12-month period and upon any subsequent impound of an animal that is claimed by its owner, an animal shelter may release the impounded animal to its owner only upon payment of all impound fees required by the shelter and:

(a)  receipt of proof the animal has been sterilized; or

(b)  a sterilization deposit.

(2)  The sterilization deposit shall be refunded to the owner only if the owner provides proof of sterilization to the animal shelter within 30 days of release of the animal to the owner.

